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PRE−CHECK
1.VGRSSYSTEMDESCRIPTION
The VGRS (Variable Gear Ratio Steering) system controls the steering angle in accordance with the vehicle
speed. The system is controlled by the VGRS ECU which operates the VGRS actuator mounted on the steer-
ing intermediate shaft. The operating angle of the actuator is added to the steering angle of the intermediate
shaft in order to vary the turning angle of the front wheels in accordance with the vehicle speed.
When the VGRS system is operating normally, the steering wheel can be turned approximately 2.4 turns
from lock to lock, with the engine running and the vehicle stopped.
When the system detects a fault, the VGRS ECU illuminates the VGRS warning light to inform the driver that
the system is not operating.
CAUTION:
There may be conditions that will cause the steering wheel to be off center.
Refer to page DI−99 for further details.

2. DIAGNOSIS SYSTEM
(a) Inspect the battery voltage.

Batteryvoltage: 11 to 14 V
If voltage isbelow 11 V, recharge thebatterybeforeproceeding.
(b) Check the warning light.

With the ignition switch ON, the light should illuminate for
2 seconds and then go out. If the light remains on after 2
seconds, check for DTCs.

HINT:
If the light does not illuminate, proceed to troubleshooting for
the VGRS warning light circuit (See page DI−1 67).

3. DTC CHECK (USING SST CHECK WIRE)
(a) Checking DTCs using a SST check wire.

SST09843 −18040
(1)Using theSST,connect terminalsTcandCGof

DLC3.
(2) Turn the ignition switch ON.
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(3) Read and record any DTCs from the VGRS warning
light on the combination meter. Refer to the chart on
the left forexamplesofanormalcodeandcodes 11
and2 1.

HINT:
If the VGRS warning light does not blink any DTC codes or the
normal code, inspect the warning light circuit.

Trouble Area See page

Tc and CG terminal circuit DI−1 69

VGRS warning light circuit DI−1 67

(4) Refer to the Diagnostic Trouble Code Chart (See
page DI−1 07) for DTC information.

(b) Clearing the DTCs using the SST check wire.
(1)Turn the ignitionswitchON.
(2) Using the SST, connect terminals Ts and CG of

DLC3.
SST09843 −18040
(3) Disconnect and connect the SST check wire from

the CG terminal 4 times or more in 8 seconds.
(4) Check that the VGRS warning light blinks a normal

code.
HINT:
If the fault has not been repaired, the code may still be dis-
played.

(5) Turn the ignition switch OFF.
(6) Remove the SST check wire from DLC3.
(7) Perform the zero point calibration for the decelera-

tion sensor and yaw rate sensor (See Pub. No.
RM970E,pageDI −185).

HINT:
When clearing the VGRS codes, the deceleration sensor and
yaw rate sensor memory is also cleared. Therefore it is neces-
sary to complete the zero point calibration (See Pub. No.
RM970E,pageDI −185).



F06425

Hand−held
Tester

DLC3

−DIAGNOSTICS VARIABLEGEARRATIOSTEERING
DI−93

LANDCRUISER(W/G)SUP(RM 1072E)

4.DTCCHECK(USINGHAND −HELDTESTER)
(a)CheckingDTCsusing theHand −held tester.

(1)Connect thehand −held tester toDLC3.
(2) Turn the ignition switch ON.
(3) Read the DTCs following the prompts on the tester

screen.
HINT:
Refer to thehand −held testeroperator’smanual for furtherde-
tails.
(b)Clearing theDTCsusing thehand −held tester.

(1)Connect thehand −held tester toDLC3.
(2) Turn the ignition switch ON.
(3) Erase the DTCs following the prompts on the tester

screen.
HINT:
Refer to thehand −held testeroperator’smanual for furtherde-
tails.

5. DATA LIST
With thehand −held testerconnected toDLC3and the ignition turnedON, theVGRSdata list canbedis-
played. Follow the prompts on the tester screen to access the Data List.

Item
Measurement Item /

Range (Display) NormalCondition DiagnosticNote

STEERINGPOS 1 Steeringsensor 1 reading /
min.: −1862deg, 1877deg −1682 to 1877deg

Turn the steering wheel changes
the value

STEERING POS2 Steering sensor 2 reading /
min.: −1862deg, 1877deg −1682 to 1877deg

Turn the steering wheel changes
the value

STRSENS 1 Steeringsensor 1 /HIGHorLOW High or Low
Turn the steering wheel switches
high or low

STR SENS2 Steering sensor 2 / HIGH or LOW High or Low
Turn the steering wheel switches
high or low

STR SENS3 Steering sensor 3 / HIGH or LOW High or Low
Turn the steering wheel switches
high or low

SPD (VSC)
Speed sensor reading /
min.:0km/h,max.:255
km/h

Actual vehiclespeed
Speed indicated on
speedometer

WHEEL SPD RR
Wheel speed sensor (RR)
reading /min.:0km/h,
max.: 255 km/h

Actual vehiclespeed
Speed indicated on
speedometer

WHEEL SPD RL
Wheel speed sensor (RL)
reading /min.:0km/h,
max.: 255 km/h

Actual vehiclespeed
Speed indicated on
speedometer

ENGINE REV (RPM)
Revolutionsensor / LESS Less than 300 Engine stop

ENGINERE V (RPM)
Revolution sensor / LESS
300 or MORE 300 More than 300 Engine running

MTRSOUCUR
Motorpowersourceactual
current / min.:0 A,max.:

Less than 10 A
Whennot turning thesteering

wheelMTR SOU CUR current / min .: 0A, max.:
127.5A Less than 60 A When turning the steering wheel

MTRSOUCUREST
Estimated motor power
sourceactual current /

Less than 10 A
When not turning the steering
wheelMTR SOU CUR EST source actual current /

min.:0A,max.: 127.5A Less than 60 A When turning the steering wheel

PIG SOURCE VOL
PIG source voltage / min.:
0 V, max.: 22.5 V 9 to 16 V IG switch ON (Engine stop)

IG SOURCE VOL
IG source voltage / min.: 0
V, max.: 22.5 V 9 to 16 V IG switch ON (Engine stop)
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MTRCUREST Motorestimationcurrent /
min : 0 A max : 1275 V

Less than 10 A
When not turning the steering
wheelMTR CUR EST

min.: 0 A ,max.: 1 27.5 V
Less than 60 A When turning the steering wheel

TERMINAL VOL U
Terminal voltage U / min.:
0 V, max.: 25.5 V 0 to 16 V

Turn the steering wheel changes
the value
(When the engine running and
VGRS system operates)

TERMINAL VOL V
Terminal voltage V / min.:
0 V, max.: 25.5 V 0 to 16 V

Turn the steering wheel changes
the value
(When the engine running and
VGRS system operates)

TERMINAL VOL W
Terminal voltage W / min.:
0 V, max.: 25.5 V 0 to 16 V

Turn the steering wheel changes
the value
(When the engine running and
VGRS system operates)

ACTUATOR POS
Actuator position / min.:
−286deg,max.:288deg −286 to288deg

Turn the steering wheel changes
the value
(When the engine running and
VGRS warning light goes off)

MTRREVANGU
Motor revolution angle
sensoroutputUHIGHor

LOW
High or Low

Turn the steering wheel changes
the value
(When the engine running and
VGRS warning light goes off)

MTR REV ANG V
Motor revolution angle
sensor output V HIGH or
LOW

High or Low

Turn the steering wheel changes
the value
(When the engine running and
VGRS warning light goes off)

MTRREVANGW
Motor revolution angle
sensoroutputWHIGHor

LOW
High or Low

Turn the steering wheel changes
the value
(When the engine running and
VGRS warning light goes off)

STR ANG VEL
Steering wheel angle ve-
locity /min.: −1862deg,
max.: 1877deg /sec.

−1862 to 1877deg /sec.

Turn the steering wheel changes
the value
(When the engine running and
VGRS warning light goes off)

LOCK OUTPUT VOL
Lock motor output voltage
/ min.: 0 V, max.: 22.5V 9 to 16 V IG switch ON (Engine stop)

THERMISTORTEMP
Thermistor temperature /
min.: −50 ˚ C,max.:205
˚ C

−50 to205 ˚ C When the VGRS system operates

ACTTARGETANGL
Actuator target angle /
min.: −286deg,max.:288

deg
−286 to288deg When theVGRSsystemoperates

ACT REV SPD
Actuator revolution speed /
min.: −1862deg,max.:
1877deg /sec.

−1862 to 1877deg /sec. When theVGRSsystemoperates

DUTY VAL
Command value DUTY /
min.:0%,max.: 100% 0 to 100% When the VGRS system operates

LOCK DUTY VAL
Command value DUTY for
actuator lockcontrol /min.:
0%,max.: 100%

Less than 10% IGswitchON

STRAIGHTANGFLG*
1 Straightsteeringangleval-

id flag / INVALID or VALID VALID or INVALID
Immediately after connecting the
battery terminal

ACT DEV ANGL
Actuator deviation angle /
min.: −286deg,max.:288
deg

−286 to288deg When theVGRSsystemoperates
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ACT TEMP EST
Actuator estimation tem-
perature / min.: −50 ˚C,
max.: 205 ˚C

−50 to 205 ˚C When the VGRS system operates

MTR OVERHEAT *2
Record of continuous over-
heat preventive control /
Rec or Unrec

Rec or Unrec −

MTR LOW POWER *2
Record of low motor power
source voltage / Rec or
Unrec

Rec or Unrec −

MTR HIGH POWER *2
Record of high motor pow-
er source voltage / Rec or
Unrec

Rec or Unrec −

FLO MALFUNCTION *2
Record of wheel speed
malfunction (left) / Rec or
Unrec

Rec or Unrec −

FRO MALFUNCTION *2
Record of wheel speed
malfunction (right) / Rec or
Unrec

Rec or Unrec −

TEST MODE Test mode / NORMAL or
TEST

NORMAL : Normal mode
TEST : During test mode −

#CODES Number of DTC recorded /
min.: 0, max.: 255 Min.: 0, max.: 39 −

*1: NOTICE:
This data must read valid before proceeding with any steering adjustments. If invalid, perform steer-
ing angle sensor initialization procedure, or if VGRS actuator or VGRS ECU has been replaced, per-
form VGRS system calibration (steering angle adjust).
*2: HINT:
When Rec is listed, reset to Unrec by going to the VGRS menu on the hand−held tester, select records clear-
ance, and follow the prompts.
6. FREEZE FRAME DATA
The VGRS ECU stores memorized data when a trouble code is set and can be viewed using the hand−held
tester.

Hand−held tester display Measurement Item Value

STEERING POS 1 Steering position 1 (parallel) −1862 to 1877

SPD (VSC) Vehicle speed (VSC ECU) Speed indicated on speedometer

ENGINE REV (RPM) Engine revolution Less than 300 or More than 300

MTR SOURCE CUR Motor power source actual current 0 to 127.5

MTR SOU CUR EST The estimated motor current 0 to 127.5

PIG SOURCE VOL PIG−power source voltage 0 to 22.5

IG SOURCE VOL IG−power source voltage 0 to 22.5

ACTUATOR POS Actuator position −286 to 288

STR ANGLE VEL Steering wheel angle velocity −1862 to 1877

LOCK OUTPUT VOL Lock motor output voltage 0 to 22 5LOCK OUTPUT VOL Lock motor output voltage 0 to 22.5

ACT TARGET ANGLE Actuator target angle −286 to 288

ACT REV SPD Actuator revolution speed −1862 to 1877

DUTY VAL Command value DUTY 0 to 100

LOCK DUTY VAL Command value DUTY for actuator lock control 0 to 100



A04550

DLC3

Ts

CG

1 2  3 4 5 6  8

9 10 111 213 1415 16

7

FI3605

Blinking

OFF

ON

0.13 Seconds

DI−96
−DIAGNOSTICS VARIABLE GEAR RATIO STEERING

LAND CRUISER (W/G) SUP (RM1072E)

7. VGRS SENSOR SIGNAL CHECK (TEST MODE)
HINT:
S Before entering Test Mode, check and repair any current

VGRS DTCs.
S When entering test mode, the 4 sensor check DTCs are

recorded at once. When the ECU judges the sensor nor-
mal during the test procedure, the DTC will be eliminated.

(a) Procedure for Sensor Test Mode using a SST check wire.
SST 09843−18040
(1) Make sure the ignition switch is OFF.
(2) Using the SST check wire, connect terminals Ts and

CG of DLC3.
(3) Turn the ignition switch ON.

(4) Check that the VGRS warning light is blinking.
HINT:
If the VGRS warning light does not blink, inspect the warning
light or Ts terminal circuits.

Trouble Area See page

Ts and CG terminal circuit DI−1 71

VGRS warning light circuit DI−1 67

(5) Start the engine.
(6) Turn the steering wheel lock to lock.

NOTICE:
S Check for any unusual feeling in the steering wheel

operation.
S Slowly turn the steering wheel from lock to lock.

check that it rotates approximately 2.4 turns.
HINT:
S The warning light display has no change.
S If the actuator moving amount is correctly checked, the

diagnostic codes C1575/75 and C1576/76 in the test
mode are cleared.
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HINT: The situation of VGRS warning light when driving.

4Hz blinking

Vehicle Speed

State 1

State 2

State 3

ON

OFF

(km/h)

Hour
State 1: If either DTC C1575/75 or C1576/76 is abnormal, the warning light remains on between 4 and

10 km/h after first starting.
State 2: If a speed sensor DTC is detected at 10 km/h or above, the warning light will remain on until

vehicle speed is less than 4 km/h.
State 3: Warning light pattern when all sensors are normal.

ON

OFF

ON

OFF

4Hz blinking

4Hz blinking

4Hz blinking

4Hz blinking

4Hz blinking

0

4

10

The light is put out by 10 km/h or more.

Illuminate

The light is put out by 4 km/h or more.
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(7) Drive the vehicle at more than 10 km/h (6 mph) for
15 to 30 seconds.

HINT:
If the vehicle speed sensor is correctly checked, the diagnostic
codes C1571/71 and C1572/72 in the test mode are cleared.

(8) Stop the vehicle. Leave the engine running.

(9) Using the SST check wire, connect the 3rd terminal
of the SST check wire to terminal Tc of DLC3.

SST 09843−18040
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(10) Read the number of blinks of the VGRS warning
light. (Refer to the chart below)

HINT:
S If all wheel speed sensors are normal, the normal blinking

code is output. (A repeating cycle of 0.25 sec. ON and
0.25 sec. OFF)

S If 2 or more faults are detected at the same time, the low-
est number will be displayed first.

(11) After completing the check, disconnect the SST
from DLC3 and turn the ignition OFF.

(b) Procedure for Sensor Test Mode using the hand−held
tester.
(1) Connect the hand−held tester.
(2) Turn the ignition switch ON.
(3) Complete the VGRS Test Mode following the

prompts on the tester screen.
HINT:
Refer to the hand−held tester operator’s manual for further de-
tails.

(4) Read the DTCs.
(5) After completing the test, disconnect the tester and

turn the ignition switch OFF.
DTC of VGRS sensor check function:

Code No. Diagnosis Trouble Area

C1571 / 71 Vehicle speed sensor malfunction (FLO)
SLeft front speed sensor
SSensor installation
SSensor rotor

C1572 / 72 Vehicle speed sensor malfunction (FRO)
SRight front speed sensor
SSensor installation
SSensor rotor

C1575 / 75 Steering angle sensor malfunction
SSteering sensor
SSensor installation

C1576 / 76 DC motor revolution sensor malfunction SVGRS actuator


